Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE A. COURTS

CHAPTER 29. MUNICIPAL COURTS

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 29.001. DEFINITION. In this chapter, "municipality" means an incorporated city, town, or village.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 29.002. CREATION. A municipal court is created in each municipality. A reference in state law to a "corporation court" means a "municipal court."

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 29.003. JURISDICTION. (a) A municipal court, including a municipal court of record, shall have exclusive original jurisdiction within the municipality's territorial limits and property owned by the municipality located in the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction in all criminal cases that:

(1) arise under:

(A) the ordinances of the municipality; or

(B) a resolution, rule, or order of a joint board operating an airport under Section 22.074, Transportation Code; and

(2) are punishable by a fine not to exceed:

(A) $2,000 in all cases arising under municipal ordinances or resolutions, rules, or orders of a joint board that govern fire safety, zoning, or public health and sanitation, other than the dumping of refuse;

(B) $4,000 in cases arising under municipal ordinances that govern the dumping of refuse; or

(C) $500 in all other cases arising under a municipal ordinance or a resolution, rule, or order of a joint board.

(b) The municipal court has concurrent jurisdiction with the justice court of a precinct in which the municipality is located in all criminal cases arising under state law that arise within the municipality's territorial limits or property owned by the municipality located in the municipality's extraterritorial jurisdiction and that:

(1) are punishable only by a fine, as defined in Subsection (c); or

(2) arise under Chapter 106, Alcoholic Beverage Code, and do not include confinement as an authorized sanction.

(c) In this section, an offense which is punishable by "fine only" is defined as an offense that is punishable by fine and such sanctions, if any, as authorized by statute not consisting of confinement in jail or imprisonment.

(d) The fact that a conviction in a municipal court has as a consequence the imposition of a penalty or sanction by an agency or entity other than the court, such as a denial, suspension, or revocation of a privilege, does not affect the original jurisdiction of the municipal court.

(e) The municipal court has jurisdiction in the forfeiture and final judgment of all bail bonds and personal bonds taken in criminal cases of which the court has jurisdiction.

(f) This section does not affect the powers given exclusively to a joint board operating an airport under Section 22.074(d), Transportation Code.

(g) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 372 (H.B. 1631), Sec. 6(1), eff. June 2, 2019.

(h) A municipality with a population of 1.19 million or more and another municipality contiguous to that municipality may enter into an agreement providing concurrent jurisdiction for the municipal courts of either jurisdiction for all criminal cases arising from offenses under state law that are:

(1) committed on the boundary of those municipalities or in one or both of the following areas:

(A) within 200 yards of that boundary; or

(B) within 2.25 miles of that boundary on a segment of highway in the state highway system that traverses a major water supply reservoir; and

(2) punishable by fine only.

(i) A municipality may enter into an agreement with a contiguous municipality or a municipality with boundaries that are within one-half mile of the municipality seeking to enter into the agreement to establish concurrent jurisdiction of the municipal courts in the municipalities and provide original jurisdiction to a municipal court in which a case is brought as if the municipal court were located in the municipality in which the case arose, for:

(1) all cases in which either municipality has jurisdiction under Subsection (a) or (b); and

(2) cases that arise under Section 821.022, Health and Safety Code, or Section 65.003(a), Family Code.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 148, Sec. 2.32(a), eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 641, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 680, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1987; Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 108, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 449, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 533, Sec. 3, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1013, Sec. 40, eff. Sept. 1, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 611, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1999; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 660, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1122, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1149 (S.B. 1119), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2007.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 230 (S.B. 1504), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 76 (H.B. 984), Sec. 1, eff. May 19, 2011.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 680 (H.B. 274), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 935 (H.B. 2398), Sec. 30, eff. September 1, 2015.

Acts 2015, 84th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1154 (S.B. 631), Sec. 2, eff. June 19, 2015.

Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1004 (H.B. 1264), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 372 (H.B. 1631), Sec. 6(1), eff. June 2, 2019.

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 934 (H.B. 3774), Sec. 3.05, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 29.004. JUDGE. (a) The judge and alternate judges of the municipal court in a home-rule city are selected under the municipality's charter provisions relating to the election or appointment of judges. The judge shall be known as the "judge of the municipal court" unless the municipality by charter provides for another title.

(b) In a general-law city, the mayor is ex officio judge of the municipal court unless the municipality by ordinance authorizes the election of the judge or provides for the appointment and qualifications of the judge. If the municipality authorizes an election, the judge shall be elected in the manner and for the same term as the mayor. If the municipality authorizes the appointment, the mayor ceases to be judge on the enactment of the ordinance. The first elected or appointed judge serves until the expiration of the mayor's term.

(c) If a general-law municipality changes the method of judicial selection from election to appointment, the first appointee takes office on the expiration of the term of the previously elected judge.

(d) A reference in the laws of this state to a "recorder" means a "judge of the municipal court."

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 29.005. TERM OF OFFICE. The judge of a municipal court serves for a term of office of two years unless the municipality provides for a longer term pursuant to Article XI, Section 11, of the Texas Constitution. A municipal court judge who is not reappointed by the 91st day following the expiration of a term of office shall, absent action by the appointing authority, continue to serve for another term of office beginning on the date the previous term of office expired.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 764, Sec. 1, eff. Jan. 1, 1994.

Sec. 29.006. TEMPORARY REPLACEMENT IN GENERAL-LAW MUNICIPALITIES. If a municipal judge of a municipality incorporated under the general laws of this state is temporarily unable to act, the governing body may appoint one or more persons meeting the qualifications for the position to sit for the regular municipal judge. The appointee has all powers and duties of the office and is entitled to compensation as set by the governing body.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 29.007. MUNICIPAL COURT PANELS OR DIVISIONS; TEMPORARY JUDGES. (a) A home-rule city by charter or by ordinance may divide the municipal court into two or more panels or divisions, one of which shall be presided over by a presiding judge. Each additional panel or division shall be presided over by an associate judge, who is a magistrate with the same powers as the presiding judge.

(b) The panels or divisions may hold concurrent or continuous sessions either day or night.

(c) Each panel or division may exercise municipal court jurisdiction and has concurrent jurisdiction with the other panels or divisions.

(d) Except as otherwise provided by the charter, the municipality by ordinance may establish:

(1) the qualifications for appointment as a judge;

(2) the ability of a judge to transfer cases, exchange benches, and preside over any of the panels or divisions;

(3) the office of the municipal court clerk, who shall serve as clerk of all the panels or divisions with the assistance of deputy clerks as needed; and

(4) a system for the filing of complaints with the municipal court clerk so that the case load is equally distributed among the panels or divisions.

(e) Except as modified by this section, procedure before a panel or division and appeal from the decision of a panel or division is governed by general law applicable to municipal courts.

(f) If the municipality has established the office of municipal court clerk, the clerk shall keep minutes of the proceedings of the municipal court and its panels or divisions, administer oaths, issue process, and generally perform the duties for the municipal court that a county clerk performs for a county court.

(g) The municipality may provide by charter or by ordinance for the appointment of one or more temporary judges to serve if the regular judge, the presiding judge, or an associate judge is temporarily unable to act. A temporary judge must have the same qualifications as the judge he replaces and has the same powers and duties as that judge.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 29.010. CLERK. (a) In a municipality that provides for the election of a municipal judge, the municipal court clerk is elected in the same manner unless by ordinance the city secretary serves as clerk. A city secretary who serves as clerk may be authorized to appoint a deputy clerk.

(b) The clerk serves a two-year term of office unless the municipality provides for a longer term pursuant to Article XI, Section 11, of the Texas Constitution. If the city secretary serves as clerk, that person serves as clerk during the term as city secretary.

(c) The clerk shall keep minutes of the proceedings of the court, issue process, and generally perform the duties for the municipal court that a county clerk performs for a county court.

(d) Subsection (a) does not apply to a home-rule municipality that provides by charter for the appointment of the clerk.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 774, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991.

Sec. 29.011. VACANCY. The governing body of the municipality shall by appointment fill a vacancy in the office of municipal judge or clerk for the remainder of the unexpired term of office only.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 29.013. REPORT TO TEXAS JUDICIAL COUNCIL. (a) The secretary of the municipality in a municipality with a municipal court, including a municipal court of record, or the employee responsible for maintaining the records of the municipality's governing body shall notify the Texas Judicial Council of the name of:

(1) each person who is elected or appointed as mayor, municipal court judge, or clerk of a municipal court; and

(2) each person who vacates an office described by Subdivision (1).

(b) The secretary or employee shall notify the judicial council not later than the 30th day after the date of the person's election or appointment to office or vacancy from office.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1184 (H.B. 3475), Sec. 2, eff. September 1, 2011.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1324 (S.B. 480), Sec. 3, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 29.014. COURT SECURITY COMMITTEE. (a) The presiding or municipal judge, as applicable, shall establish a court security committee composed of:

(1) the presiding or municipal judge, or the judge's designee;

(2) a representative of the law enforcement agency or other entity that provides the primary security for the court;

(3) a representative of the municipality; and

(4) any other person the committee determines necessary to assist the committee.

(b) The person described by Subsection (a)(1) serves as presiding officer of the committee.

(c) The committee shall establish the policies and procedures necessary to provide adequate security to the municipal courts served by the presiding or municipal judge, as applicable.

(d) A committee may recommend to the municipality the uses of resources and expenditures of money for courthouse security, but may not direct the assignment of those resources or the expenditure of those funds.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 190 (S.B. 42), Sec. 3, eff. September 1, 2017.

Sec. 29.015. LOCATION FOR COURT PROCEEDINGS AND TERMS AND SESSIONS OF COURT FOLLOWING CERTAIN DISASTERS. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, if a disaster, as defined by Section 418.004, precludes a municipal court from conducting its proceedings at the location assigned for the proceedings, the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region, with the approval of the judge of the affected municipal court, may designate for the proceedings an alternate location:

(1) in the corporate limits of the municipality; or

(2) outside the corporate limits of the municipality at the location the presiding judge determines is closest in proximity to the municipality that allows the court to safely and practicably conduct its proceedings, provided the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region for the designated location approves if that presiding judge is not the presiding judge making the designation.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, if a disaster, as defined by Section 418.004, precludes a municipal court from holding its terms, the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region, with the approval of the judge of the affected municipal court, may designate the terms and sessions of court.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 507 (S.B. 40), Sec. 13, eff. June 7, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER A-1. RECUSAL OR DISQUALIFICATION OF MUNICIPAL JUDGES

Sec. 29.051. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Active judge" means a person who holds office as a district court judge or statutory county court judge.

(2) "Presiding judge" means the presiding judge of a municipal court, including a municipal court of record.

(3) "Regional presiding judge" means the presiding judge of the administrative judicial region appointed under Section 74.005.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1184 (H.B. 3475), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1324 (S.B. 480), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 29.052. MOTION FOR RECUSAL OR DISQUALIFICATION. (a) A party in a hearing or trial in a municipal court, including a municipal court of record, may file with the clerk of the court a motion stating grounds for the recusal or disqualification of the municipal judge. The grounds may include any disability of the judge to preside over the case.

(b) A motion for the recusal or disqualification of a municipal judge must:

(1) be filed at least 10 days before the date of the hearing or trial, except as provided by Subsection (c);

(2) be verified; and

(3) state with particularity the alleged grounds for recusal or disqualification of the judge based on:

(A) personal knowledge that is supported by admissible evidence; or

(B) specifically stated grounds for belief of the allegations.

(c) A motion for recusal or disqualification must be filed at the earliest practicable time before the beginning of the trial or other hearing if a judge is assigned to a case 10 or fewer days before the date set for a trial or hearing.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1184 (H.B. 3475), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1324 (S.B. 480), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 29.053. NOTICE. A party filing a motion for recusal or disqualification under this subchapter shall serve on all other parties or their counsel:

(1) copies of the motion; and

(2) notice that the movant expects the motion to be presented to the judge three days after the filing of the motion unless the judge orders otherwise.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1184 (H.B. 3475), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1324 (S.B. 480), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 29.054. STATEMENT OPPOSING OR CONCURRING WITH MOTION. A party may file with the clerk of the court a statement opposing or concurring with a motion for recusal or disqualification at any time before the motion is heard.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1184 (H.B. 3475), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1324 (S.B. 480), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 29.055. PROCEDURE FOLLOWING FILING OF MOTION; RECUSAL OR DISQUALIFICATION WITHOUT MOTION. (a) Before further proceedings in a case in which a motion for the recusal or disqualification of a municipal judge has been filed, the judge shall:

(1) recuse or disqualify himself or herself; or

(2) request the regional presiding judge to assign a judge to hear the motion.

(b) A municipal judge who with or without a motion recuses or disqualifies himself or herself:

(1) shall enter an order of recusal or disqualification and:

(A) if the municipal judge is not the presiding judge, request the presiding judge to assign any other judge of the municipal court, including the presiding judge, to hear the case;

(B) if the municipal judge is the presiding judge, request the regional presiding judge to assign another judge of the municipal court to hear the case; or

(C) if the municipal judge serves in a municipality with only one municipal judge, request the regional presiding judge to assign a judge of another municipal court in the county to hear the case; and

(2) may not take other action in the case, except that a judge who recuses himself or herself for good cause may take other action as stated in the order in which the action is taken.

(c) A municipal judge who does not recuse or disqualify himself or herself:

(1) shall forward, in original form or certified copy, an order of referral, the motion, and all opposing and concurring statements to the regional presiding judge; and

(2) may not take other action in the case during the time after the filing of the motion for recusal or disqualification and before a hearing on the motion, except for good cause stated in the order in which the action is taken.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1184 (H.B. 3475), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1324 (S.B. 480), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 29.056. HEARING ON MOTION. (a) A regional presiding judge who receives a request for the assignment of a judge to hear a motion to recuse or disqualify shall:

(1) immediately set a hearing before the regional presiding judge, an active judge, or a judge on the list of judges who are eligible to serve on assignment under Section 74.055;

(2) cause notice of the hearing to be given to all parties or their counsel; and

(3) make any other orders, including orders on interim or ancillary relief in the pending cause as justice may require.

(b) A judge who hears a motion for recusal or disqualification under Subsection (a) may also hear any amended or supplemented motion for recusal or disqualification filed in the case.

(c) If none of the parties to an action object, a hearing under Subsection (a) or (b) may be conducted by telephone.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1184 (H.B. 3475), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1324 (S.B. 480), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 29.057. PROCEDURE FOLLOWING GRANTING OF MOTION. (a) If a motion for recusal or disqualification is granted after a hearing is conducted as provided by Section 29.056, the judge who heard the motion shall enter an order of recusal or disqualification, and:

(1) if the judge who was the subject of the motion is not the presiding judge, request that the presiding judge assign any other judge of the municipality, including the presiding judge, to hear the case;

(2) if the judge who was the subject of the motion is the presiding judge, request the regional presiding judge to assign another judge of the municipality to hear the case; or

(3) if the judge subject to recusal or disqualification is located in a municipality with only one municipal judge, request the regional presiding judge to assign a judge of another municipal court in the county to hear the case.

(b) If the presiding judge is unable to assign a judge of the municipality to hear a case when a municipal judge is recused or disqualified under Section 29.055 or 29.056 because there are not any other municipal judges in the municipality or because all the municipal judges have been recused or disqualified or are otherwise unavailable to hear the case, the presiding judge shall request the regional presiding judge to first assign a municipal judge from another municipality in the county or, if necessary, assign a municipal judge from a municipality in an adjacent county to hear the case.

(c) If the regional presiding judge is unable to assign a judge to hear a case when a municipal judge is recused or disqualified under Section 29.055 or 29.056 because there are not any other municipal judges in the county or because all the municipal judges have been recused or disqualified or are otherwise unavailable to hear the case, the regional presiding judge may assign a municipal judge from a municipality in an adjacent county to hear the case.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1184 (H.B. 3475), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1324 (S.B. 480), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 29.058. APPEAL. (a) After a municipal court of record has rendered a final judgment in a case, a party may appeal an order that denies a motion for recusal or disqualification as an abuse of the court's discretion.

(b) A party may not appeal an order that grants a motion for recusal or disqualification.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1184 (H.B. 3475), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1324 (S.B. 480), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 29.059. CONTEMPT. If a party files a motion to recuse or disqualify under this subchapter and it is determined by the judge hearing the motion, at the hearing and on motion of the opposing party, that the motion to recuse or disqualify is brought solely for the purpose of delay and without sufficient cause, the judge may in the interest of justice find the party filing the motion in contempt under Section 21.002(c).

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1184 (H.B. 3475), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1324 (S.B. 480), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 29.060. COMPENSATION. (a) An active judge who is assigned to hear a motion to recuse or disqualify a municipal judge under this subchapter is not entitled to additional compensation other than travel expenses. A judge assigned to hear a motion to recuse or disqualify who is not an active judge is entitled to:

(1) compensation of $450 per day of service, prorated for any day for which the judge provides less than a full day of service; and

(2) travel expenses.

(b) A municipal judge assigned under this subchapter to hear a case in a court other than the one in which the judge resides or serves is entitled to compensation provided by law for judges in similar cases and travel expenses.

(c) The municipality in which a case subject to this subchapter is pending shall pay the compensation and travel expenses due or incurred under this subchapter.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1184 (H.B. 3475), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2011.

Added by Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 1324 (S.B. 480), Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 2011.

SUBCHAPTER B. MUNICIPAL COURTS IN CERTAIN CITIES

Sec. 29.101. MUNICIPALITY OF MORE THAN 250,000. (a) A municipality with a population of more than 250,000 may by ordinance establish two municipal courts. With the confirmation of the governing body of the municipality, the mayor may appoint two or more judges for the courts and may designate the seniority of the judges.

(b) Either or both of the courts may hold concurrent or continuous sessions either day or night.

(c) Each court may exercise municipal court jurisdiction and has concurrent jurisdiction with the other municipal courts.

(d) The municipality by ordinance may establish:

(1) the qualifications for appointment as a municipal judge;

(2) the ability of a judge to transfer cases, exchange benches, and preside over any of the municipal courts;

(3) the office of the municipal court clerk, who shall serve as clerk of all the municipal courts with the assistance of deputy clerks as needed; and

(4) a system for the filing of complaints with the municipal court clerk so that the case load is equally distributed among the courts.

(e) Except as modified by this section, procedure before each of the courts and appeal from a decision of either of the courts are governed by general law applicable to municipal courts.

(f) This section supersedes any municipal charter provision that conflicts with this section.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 29.102. MUNICIPALITY OF 130,001 TO 285,000. (a) An incorporated municipality with a population of 130,001 to 285,000 by ordinance may establish up to four additional municipal courts. The judge of each additional court must meet the same qualifications and be selected in the same manner as provided in the city charter for the judges of the existing municipal courts. If the charter provides for the election of municipal judges, the governing body of the municipality may appoint a person to serve as judge in each newly created court until the next regular city election.

(b) The courts may hold concurrent or continuous sessions either day or night.

(c) Each court may exercise municipal court jurisdiction and has concurrent jurisdiction with the other municipal courts.

(d) Except as otherwise provided by the charter, the governing body by ordinance may establish:

(1) the qualifications for appointment as a municipal judge;

(2) the ability of a judge to transfer cases, exchange benches, and preside over any of the municipal courts;

(3) the office of the municipal court clerk, who shall serve as clerk of all the municipal courts with the assistance of deputy clerks as needed; and

(4) a system for the filing of complaints with the municipal court clerk so that the case load is equally distributed among the courts.

(e) Except as modified by this section, procedure before each of the courts and appeal from a decision of any of the courts are governed by general law applicable to municipal courts.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 29.103. MUNICIPAL COURTS IN EL PASO. (a) The City of El Paso by ordinance may establish additional municipal courts as needed. The judge of each additional court must meet the same qualifications and be selected in the same manner as provided in the city charter for the judges of the existing municipal courts. If the charter provides for the election of municipal judges, the governing body of the municipality may appoint a person to serve as judge in each newly created court until the next regular city election.

(b) The courts may hold concurrent or continuous sessions either day or night.

(c) Each court may exercise municipal court jurisdiction and has concurrent jurisdiction with the other municipal courts.

(d) Except as otherwise provided by the charter, the governing body may by ordinance establish:

(1) the qualifications for appointment as a municipal judge;

(2) the ability of a judge to transfer cases, exchange benches, and preside over any of the municipal courts;

(3) the office of the municipal court clerk, who shall serve as clerk of all the municipal courts with the assistance of deputy clerks as needed; and

(4) a system for the filing of complaints with the municipal court clerk so that the case load is equally distributed among the courts.

(e) Except as modified by this section, procedure before each of the courts and appeal from a decision of any of the courts are governed by general law applicable to municipal courts.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Sec. 29.104. MUNICIPAL COURT PROCEEDINGS OUTSIDE CORPORATE LIMITS. The municipal court of a municipality with a population of 3,500 or less may conduct its proceedings within the corporate limits of a contiguous incorporated municipality.

Acts 1985, 69th Leg., ch. 480, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1985.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 380 (H.B. 3561), Sec. 1, eff. June 14, 2013.

Sec. 29.105. MUNICIPAL COURT PROCEEDINGS IN MUNICIPALITY PARTICIPATING IN POLICE DEPARTMENT CONTRACT. A municipality that contracts with one or more municipalities for the operation of a joint police department may conduct its municipal court proceedings within the municipal limits of any municipality that is a party to the contract.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 741, Sec. 1, eff. June 15, 1995.